Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-349
Sections, how construed.

Nothing in sections 24-345 to 24-349 shall be taken to modify or amend any existing statute relating to witness fees, fines, penalties, forfeitures or license money.

Laws 1933, c. 33, § 5, p. 216;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 27-346;

R.S.1943, § 24-349.